District of Columbia statutes.
26-431.03

Community needs obligation.

A financial institution shall have a continuing and affirmative obligation to meet the credit needs of its local communities, including low-income and moderate-income area, consistent with the safe and sound operation of the financial institution.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 403, 48 DCR 3244

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-431.06.